Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7707
Certificate of public advantage; termination.

If the department determines at any time that the likely benefits resulting from a certified cooperative agreement no longer outweigh any disadvantages attributable to any potential reduction in competition resulting from the agreement, the department shall initiate proceedings to terminate the certificate of public advantage in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 117.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.